Utah statutes.
35A-4-501.   Unemployment Compensation Fund -- Administration -- Contents --
Treasurer and custodian -- Separate accounts -- Use of money requisitioned --
Advances under Social Security Act.
(1) (a)  There is established the Unemployment Compensation Fund, separate and
apart from all public money or funds of this state, that shall be administered
by the department exclusively for the purposes of this chapter.
(b)  This fund shall consist of the following money, all of which shall be
mingled and undivided:
(i)  all contributions collected under this chapter, less refunds of
contributions made from the clearing account under Subsection 35A-4-306(5);
(ii)  interest earned upon any money in the fund;
(iii)  any property or securities acquired through the use of money belonging
to the fund;
(iv)  all earnings of the property or securities;
(v)  all money credited to this state's account in the unemployment trust fund
under Section 903 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1101 et seq., as
amended; and
(vi)  all other money received for the fund from any other source.
(2) (a)  The state treasurer shall:
(i)  be the treasurer and custodian of the fund;
(ii)  administer the fund in accordance with the directions of the division;
and
(iii)  pay all warrants drawn upon it by the division or its duly authorized
agent in accordance with rules made by the department.
(b)  The division shall maintain within the fund three separate accounts:
(i)  a clearing account;
(ii)  an unemployment trust fund account; and
(iii)  a benefit account.
(c)  All money payable to the fund, upon receipt by the division, shall be
immediately deposited in the clearing account.
(d) (i)  All money in the clearing account after clearance shall, except as
otherwise provided in this section, be deposited immediately with the
secretary of the treasury of the United States of America to the credit of the
account of this state in the unemployment trust fund, established and
maintained under Section 904 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1104, as
amended, any provisions of law in this state relating to the deposit,
administration, release, or disbursement of money in the possession or custody
of this state to the contrary notwithstanding.
(ii)  Refunds of contributions payable under Subsections 35A-4-205(1)(a) and
35A-4-306(5) may be paid from the clearing account or the benefit account.
(e)  The benefit account shall consist of all money requisitioned from this
state's account in the unemployment trust fund in the United States treasury.
(f)  Money in the clearing and benefit accounts may be deposited in any
depository bank in which general funds of this state may be deposited, but no
public deposit insurance charge or premium may be paid out of the fund.
(g) (i)  Money in the clearing and benefit accounts may not be commingled with
other state funds, but shall be maintained in separate accounts on the books
of the depository bank.
(ii)  The money shall be secured by the depository bank to the same extent and
in the same manner as required by the general depository law of this state.
(iii)  Collateral pledged for this purpose shall be kept separate and distinct
from any collateral pledged to secure other funds of the state.
(h) (i)  The state treasurer is liable on the state treasurer's official bond
for the faithful performance of the state treasurer's duties in connection
with the unemployment compensation fund provided for under this chapter.
(ii)  The liability on the official bond shall be effective immediately upon
the enactment of this provision, and that liability shall exist in addition to
the liability upon any separate bond existent on the effective date of this
provision, or which may be given in the future.
(iii)  All sums recovered for losses sustained by the fund shall be deposited
in the fund.
(3) (a) (i)  Money requisitioned from the state's account in the unemployment
trust fund shall, except as set forth in this section, be used exclusively for
the payment of benefits and for refunds of contributions under Subsections
35A-4-205(1)(a) and 35A-4-306(5).
(ii)  The department shall from time to time requisition from the unemployment
trust fund amounts, not exceeding the amounts standing to this state's account
in the fund, as it considers necessary for the payment of those benefits and
refunds for a reasonable future period.
(iii) (A)  Upon receipt the treasurer shall deposit the money in the benefit
account and shall pay benefits and refunds from the account by means of
warrants issued by the division in accordance with rules prescribed by the
department.
(B)  Expenditures of these money in the benefit account and refunds from the
clearing account are not subject to any provisions of law requiring specific
appropriations or other formal release by state officers of money in their
custody.
(b)  Money in the state's account in the unemployment trust fund that were
collected under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, 26 U.S.C. 3301 et seq., and
credited to the state under Section 903 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
1101 et seq., as amended may be requisitioned from the state's account and
used in the payment of expenses incurred by the department for the
administration of the state's unemployment law and public employment offices,
if the expenses are incurred and the withdrawals are made only after and under
a specific appropriation of the Legislature that specifies:
(i)  the purposes and amounts;
(ii)  that the money may not be obligated after the two-year period that began
on the date of the enactment of the appropriation law; and
(iii)  that the total amount which may be used during a fiscal year shall not
exceed the amount by which the aggregate of the amounts credited to this
state's account under Section 903 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1101
et seq., as amended, during the fiscal year and the 34 preceding fiscal years,
exceeds the aggregate of the amounts used by this state for administration
during the same 35 fiscal years.
(A)  For the purpose of Subsection (3)(b)(iii), amounts used during any fiscal
year shall be charged against equivalent amounts that were first credited and
that have not previously been so charged.  An amount used during any fiscal
year may not be charged against any amount credited during a fiscal year
earlier than the 34th preceding fiscal year.
(B)  Except as appropriated and used for administrative expenses, as provided
in this section, money transferred to this state under Section 903 of the
Social Security Act as amended, may be used only for the payment of benefits.
(C)  Any money used for the payment of benefits may be restored for
appropriation and use for administrative expenses, upon request of the
governor, under Section 903(c) of the Social Security Act.
(D)  The division shall maintain a separate record of the deposit, obligation,
expenditure, and return of funds deposited.
(E)  Money deposited shall, until expended, remain a part of the unemployment
fund and, if not expended, shall be returned promptly to the account of this
state in the unemployment trust fund.
(F)  The money available by reason of this legislative appropriation shall not
be expended or available for expenditure in any manner that would permit their
substitution for, or a corresponding reduction in, federal funds that would in
the absence of the money be available to finance expenditures for the
administration of this chapter.
(c)  Any balance of money requisitioned from the unemployment trust fund that
remains unclaimed or unpaid in the benefit account after the expiration of the
period for which the sums were requisitioned shall either be deducted from
estimates for, and may be utilized for the payment of, benefits and refunds
during succeeding periods, or in the discretion of the division, shall be
redeposited with the secretary of the treasury of the United States of America
to the credit of the state's account in the unemployment trust fund, as
provided in Subsection (2).
(4) (a)  The provisions of Subsections (1), (2), and (3), to the extent that
they relate to the unemployment trust fund, shall be operative only so long as
the unemployment trust fund continues to exist and so long as the secretary of
the treasury of the United States of America continues to maintain for the
state a separate book account of all money deposited in the fund by the state
for benefit purposes, together with the state's proportionate share of the
earnings of the unemployment trust fund, from which no other state is
permitted to make withdrawals.
(b) (i)  When the unemployment trust fund ceases to exist, or the separate
book account is no longer maintained, all money belonging to the unemployment
compensation fund of the state shall be administered by the division as a
trust fund for the purpose of paying benefits under this chapter, and the
division shall have authority to hold, invest, transfer, sell, deposit, and
release the money, and any properties, securities, or earnings acquired as an
incident to the administration.
(ii)  The money shall be invested in readily marketable bonds or other
interest-bearing obligations of the United States of America, of the state, or
of any county, city, town, or school district of the state, at current market
prices for the bonds.
(iii)  The investment shall be made so that all the assets of the fund shall
always be readily convertible into cash when needed for the payment of
benefits.
